Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-531
Wild animals; explosive traps; poison gas; unlawful use; penalty.

Except as provided in section 37-561, it shall be unlawful to set or place any explosive trap or device, operated by the use of poison gas or by the explosion of gunpowder or other explosives, for the purpose of taking, stunning, or destroying wild animals. Any person who sets or places any such trap or device, except as is permitted in such section, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1945, c. 83, § 1, p. 302;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 196;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-523;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 251.